Arkansas, session 2025, HB1356.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 12-12-913(j)(1)(B)(viii), concerning
disclosure of sex offender registration records, is amended to read as
follows to add clarifying language:
(viii) The sex offender's parole, post-release
supervision, or probation office;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 12-12-1201 is amended to read as follows to
add clarifying language and make stylistic changes:
12-12-1201. Authorization.
The Arkansas Crime Information Center is authorized to may develop and
operate a computerized victim notification system which shall provide:
(1) A mechanism for victims of criminal offenses or the victim's
next of kin to access information about proceedings in the criminal justice
*CEB115*
01/31/2025 10:52:32 AM CEB115

HB1356
and corrections systems by use of a twenty-four-hour toll-free in-watts
telephone service; and
(2) Automatic notification by computerized telephone service to
the victims of criminal offenses or the victim's next of kin of:
(A) An inmate's, parolee's, or probationer's The status of
an inmate, parolee, person on post-release supervision, or probationer,
including the location of the inmate, parolee, person on post-release
supervision, or probationer;
(B) A person's release or modification of a conditional
release from the custody of the Arkansas State Hospital, a local or regional
hospital, a local or regional mental health facility, or a local or regional
jail to which the person has been committed by a court when the person
committed a criminal act against the victim but was adjudicated in the
criminal case to have a mental disease or defect under § 5-2-301 et seq.; and
(C) A sex offender's application for the termination of
the obligation to register as a sex offender under § 12-12-919.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 12-15-208 is amended to read as follows to
add clarifying language:
12-15-208. Department of Corrections employees — Eligibility to carry
concealed handgun.
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections or his or her
designee may authorize an employee of the Department of Corrections to carry
a concealed handgun into a building in which or a location on which a law
enforcement officer may carry a concealed handgun, as long as the individual:
(1) Is presently employed with the department, except as
provided under subdivision (d)(2) of this section;
(2) Is not subject to any disciplinary action that suspends his
or her authority to work;
(3) Is carrying a badge or appropriate written and photographic
identification issued by the department;
(4) Is not otherwise prohibited under federal law from
possessing or receiving a firearm;
(5) Is not under the influence of alcohol or another
intoxicating or hallucinatory drug or substance;
(6) Has provided written authorization for state- and national-
01/31/2025 10:52:32 AM CEB115

HB1356
level criminal history records screening with the results of the screening
showing that the individual is eligible to legally possess and carry a
firearm;
(7) Has fingerprint impressions on file with the Division of
Arkansas State Police automated fingerprint identification system; and
(8) Has completed a weapons qualification course administered by
the department.
(b) The secretary or his or her designee retains full discretion to
deny an employee's request under this section.
(c) An individual carrying a concealed handgun under this section
shall annually complete a weapons requalification course administered by the
department.
(d) An individual authorized to carry a concealed handgun under this
section:
(1) Shall immediately be prohibited from carrying a concealed
handgun under this section if the individual no longer meets the criteria
stated in subdivisions (a)(2)-(5) of this section; and
(2) Before his or her last day of employment with the
department, may seek authorization from the secretary or his or her designee
to continue to carry a concealed handgun under this section for an additional
six (6) months after his or her last day of employment with the department.
(e)(1) The secretary shall maintain a list of individuals authorized
to carry a concealed handgun under this section.
(2) The list required under subdivision (e)(1) of this section:
(A) Shall identify the name and location of assignment for
each individual authorized to carry a concealed handgun under this section;
(B) Shall be kept confidential; and
(C) Is not subject to disclosure under the Freedom of
Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 12-18-103(14)(A)(iii), concerning
definitions under the Child Maltreatment Act, is amended to read as follows
to clarify a reference:
(iii) Failure to take reasonable action to protect
the child from abandonment, abuse, sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, or
neglect when the existence of the condition was known or should have been
01/31/2025 10:52:32 AM CEB115

HB1356
known, and, if for abuse or neglect, the failure to take reasonable action to
protect the juvenile child causes the juvenile child serious bodily injury;

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 12-26-103(a), concerning the Office of
Criminal Detention Facilities Review Coordinator, is amended to read as
follows to correct a reference:
(a) There is established the Office of Criminal Detention Facilities
Review Coordinator within the Department of Corrections Department of Public
Safety which shall consist of:
(1) A Criminal Detention Facilities Review Coordinator, who
shall be hired and employed by and serve at the pleasure of the Secretary of
the Department of Public Safety;
(2) An administrative assistant; and
(3) Other staff permanently or temporarily assigned from within
the Department of Public Safety.

SECTION 6. DO NOT CODIFY. CONSTRUCTION AND LEGISLATIVE INTENT.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) The enactment and adoption of this act shall not expressly
or impliedly repeal an act passed during the regular session of the Ninety-
Fifth General Assembly;
(2) To the extent that a conflict exists between an act of the
regular session of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly and this act:
(A) The act of the regular session of the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly shall be treated as a subsequent act passed by the General
Assembly for the purposes of:
(i) Giving the act of the regular session of the
Ninety-Fifth General Assembly its full force and effect; and
(ii) Amending or repealing the appropriate parts of
the Arkansas Code of 1987; and
(B) Section 1-2-107 shall not apply; and
(3) This act shall make only technical, not substantive, changes
to the Arkansas Code of 1987.



01/31/2025 10:52:32 AM CEB115